Massachusetts, session 194th, S1282.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 276 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 58B the
following section:-
Section 58C. (a) A person who has been charged with a violent crime, as defined by
section 121 of chapter 140, and who has been released after a hearing pursuant to sections 42A,
58, 58A or 87, and who has subsequently been determined, after a hearing, by clear and
convincing evidence, to have violated a condition of his release by committing any offense an
element of which is the use or unlawful possession of a firearm, rifle, shotgun, machinegun or
assault weapon, shall be deemed a danger to the safety of the community; and the judicial officer
shall enter an order of revocation and detention.
(b) A person who has been charged with any offense an element of which is the use or
unlawful possession of a firearm, rifle, shotgun, machinegun or assault weapon, and who has
been released after a hearing pursuant to sections 42A, 58, 58A or 87, and who has subsequently
of 2

been determined, after a hearing, by clear and convincing evidence, to have violated a condition
of his release by committing a violent crime, as defined by section 121 of chapter 140, shall be
deemed a danger to the safety of the community; and the judicial officer shall enter an order of
revocation and detention.
(c) A person who has been charged with any offense an element of which is the use or
unlawful possession of a firearm, rifle, shotgun, machinegun or assault weapon, and who has
been released after a hearing pursuant to sections 42A, 58, 58A or 87, and who has subsequently
been determined, after a hearing, by clear and convincing evidence, to have violated a condition
of his release by committing any offense an element of which is the use or unlawful possession
of a firearm, rifle, shotgun, machinegun or assault weapon, shall be deemed a danger to the
safety of the community; and the judicial officer shall enter an order of revocation and detention.
(d) A person detained under this section shall be brought to a trial as soon as reasonably
possible, but in absence of good cause, the person so held shall not be detained for a period
exceeding 120 days by the district court or for a period exceeding 180 days by the superior court
excluding any period of delay as defined in Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure Rule
36(b)(2).
of 2